Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2431.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 2 TLSB 6695YH (2) 91 ss/ns H.F. 2431 Section 1. Section 43.101, Code 2026, is amended to read as 1 follows: 2 43.101 County central committee officers. 3 The county central committee shall elect a chair, co-chair 4 vice chair , secretary, treasurer, and other officers as it may 5 determine. The term of office of an officer begins at the 6 time specified by the partyâs state constitution or bylaws and 7 continues for two years and until the officerâs successor is 8 elected and qualified, unless the officer dies, resigns, or is 9 sooner removed by the county central committee for inattention 10 to duty or incompetency. 11